Arkansas, session 2025, SB523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The regulatory framework governing private clubs in this state
needs to be modernized to reflect evolving economic realities;
(2) Permitting flexibility in business structures can enhance
efficiency and economic viability and encourage broader investment and
growth;
(3) Allowing private clubs in dry counties to operate through diverse
business entities, including without limitation corporations, partnerships,
and limited liability companies, will foster competitive fairness, stimulate
local economic development, and attract increased investment by offering
businesses greater operational flexibility; and
(4) Permitting private clubs in dry counties to function through any
legally recognized business entity structure, including without limitation
*CRH277*
04-07-2025 10:30:00 CRH277

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 SB523
corporations, partnerships, limited liability companies, or sole
proprietorships, aligns regulatory practices with modern business practices
and enhances the state's overall economic competitiveness.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 3-4-108(b), concerning the selling of
alcoholic beverages with a food purchase by a private club, is amended to
read as follows:
(b) A private club holding a valid alcoholic beverage permit may serve
alcoholic beverages in a sealed container during legal operating hours
directly to a member or a guest of a member of the private club who is
twenty-one (21) years of age or older along with the purchase of a meal as
defined in § 3-9-202:
(1) At the point of sale to be consumed off-premises;
(2) At the drive-through to be consumed off-premises;
(3) At the curbside to be consumed off-premises; or
(4) Delivered to a consumer at a location off-premises.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 3-4-405(a)(18)-(20), concerning certain
actions by private clubs that are Class C permit violations, are repealed.
(18) Failure to maintain membership books or properly maintain
guestbooks by a private club;
(19) Allowing an unauthorized guest in a private club;
(20) Dispensing to nonmembers or nonguests by a private club;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 3-5-1901(7), concerning the definition of a
microbrewery-restaurant private club" under the law regarding microbrewery-
restaurant private club permits, is amended to read as follows:
(7) “Microbrewery-restaurant private club” means a nonprofit
organization, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or sole-
propriertorship organized and existing or authorized to do business under the
laws of this state that:
(A) Is is both a microbrewery and a restaurant;
(B) Has members, which are not directly or indirectly
benefitted by the entity's net revenues;
(C) Exists for some common recreational, social,
patriotic, political, national, benevolent, athletic, community hospitality,
04-07-2025 10:30:00 CRH277

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 SB523
professional association, entertainment, or other object or purpose other
than the consumption of alcoholic beverages; and
(D) Has existed for at least one (1) year;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 3-5-1902 is amended to read as follows:
3-5-1902. Microbrewery-restaurant private club.
(a) A microbrewery-restaurant private club applicant shall be an
entity organized and existing or authorized to do business under the laws of
this state before applying for a microbrewery-restaurant private club permit
as prescribed in this subchapter.
(b) The net revenues of the microbrewery-restaurant private club shall
not directly or indirectly benefit its members, except for the payment of
bona fide expenses of the microbrewery-restaurant private club's operations.
(c) Activities at the microbrewery-restaurant private club shall be
conducted for some common recreational, social, patriotic, political,
national, benevolent, athletic, community hospitality, professional
association, entertainment, or other object or purpose and not solely for the
consumption of alcoholic beverages.
(d)(1) At the time of application for a microbrewery-restaurant
private club permit, the entity shall own or lease, be the holder of a buy-
sell agreement or offer and acceptance, or have an option to lease a
building, property, or space for the reasonable comfort and accommodation of
its members and the families and guests of its members.
(2) The microbrewery-restaurant private club shall restrict the
use of club facilities to its members and the families and guests of its
members.
(e) For purposes of this subchapter, a person is a member of the
microbrewery-restaurant private club only upon ordering an alcoholic beverage
as defined in § 3-5-1901.
(f)(c) If the entity holding a microbrewery-restaurant private club
permit additionally holds another alcoholic beverage permit, the hours of
operation authorized for the microbrewery-restaurant private club apply to
all permits of the entity.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 3-5-1904(a)(4) and (5), concerning the
selling and serving certain alcoholic beverages on-premises by the holder of
04-07-2025 10:30:00 CRH277

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 SB523
a microbrewery-restaurant private club permit are amended to read as follows:
(4) Sell on the premises beer, malt beverage, or hard cider
manufactured by the microbrewery-restaurant private club or commonly owned
facility to a member guest for on-premises consumption during legal operating
hours;
(5) Serve to a member guest on-premises complimentary samples of
beer, malt beverages, or hard cider produced by the microbrewery-restaurant
private club;

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 3-5-1904(e)(3), concerning advertising of a
social function by a microbrewery-restaurant private club, is amended to read
as follows:
(3) The advertising for the social function shall be preceded by
the words “Notice to Members” and the name of the club or organization
sponsoring the social activity.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 3-5-1905(a), concerning sales prohibited by
a microbrewery-restaurant private club, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A microbrewery-restaurant private club permitted under this
subchapter shall not sell alcoholic beverages either by the package or by the
drink to a guest:
(1) Nonmember for on-premises or off-premises consumption; or
(2) Member for off-premises consumption.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 3-5-1906(1), concerning the permit fee for
a microbrewery-restaurant private club, is amended to read as follows:
(1) Pay the applicable city or county permit fees and barrelage
or taxes and shall pay a state permitting fee to the Alcoholic Beverage
Control Division of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) per fiscal year to
manufacture and sell to members guests its beer, malt beverages, and hard
cider for on-premises consumption and to sell to members guests other beer,
malt beverages, hard cider, and spirituous liquor purchased from a permitted
retailer for on-premises consumption;

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 3-5-1907(a)(3), concerning the information
required for an application of an applicant that is reapplying for a
04-07-2025 10:30:00 CRH277

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 SB523
microbrewery-restaurant private club permit within two (2) years of denial,
is amended to read as follows:
(3) The petition on which the signatures are obtained under this
section shall state clearly that the purpose of the petition is to obtain an
alcoholic beverage permit for a microbrewery-restaurant private club and to
serve alcoholic beverages to members guests.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 3-9-202(14), as amended by Acts 2025, No. 421, §
3, concerning the definition of a private club, is amended to read as
follows:
(14)(A)(i) “Private club” means, except as provided in
subdivision (14)(D) of this section, a nonprofit corporation, sole-
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or limited liability company
organized and existing or authorized to do business under the laws of this
state, no part of the net revenues of which shall inure directly or
indirectly to the benefit of any of its members or any other individual,
except for the payment of bona fide expenses of the club's operations, and
which is conducted for some common recreational, social, patriotic,
political, national, benevolent, athletic, community hospitality,
professional association, entertainment, or other nonprofit object or purpose
other than the consumption of alcoholic beverages.
(ii) The nonprofit corporation shall have been in
existence for a period of not less than one (1) year before applying for a
permit, as prescribed in this subchapter.
(iii) At the time of application for the permit, the
nonprofit corporation must have not fewer than one hundred (100) members and
at the time of application must own or lease, be the holder of a buy-sell
agreement or offer and acceptance, or have an option to lease a building,
property, or space therein for the reasonable comfort and accommodation of
its members and their families and guests and restrict the use of club
facilities to those persons.
(B) For purposes of this subdivision (14), a person shall
be required to become a member of the private club in any wet area of the
state only upon ordering an alcoholic beverage as defined under subdivision
(1) of this section.
(C) Furthermore, where the business entity that holds a
04-07-2025 10:30:00 CRH277

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 SB523
private club permit additionally holds a retail beer permit, retail wine for
consumption on the premises permit, or cafe or restaurant wine permit, the
hours of operation authorized for the private club shall likewise apply to
all permits of the business entity.
(D) A corporation, partnership, individual, or limited
liability company applying for a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility
private club permit under § 3-9-221(a)(3)(B) is not required to form a
nonprofit corporation but shall otherwise comply with all requirements of §
3-9-240;

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 3-9-221, as amended by Acts 2025, No. 421,
§ 3, is amended to read as follows:
3-9-221. Private clubs — Exception from alcoholic beverage laws.
(a) The General Assembly recognizes that:
(1) Many individuals in this state serve mixed drinks containing
alcoholic beverages to their friends and guests in the privacy of their homes
and, in addition, that many individuals associated together in private
nonprofit corporations established for fraternal, patriotic, recreational,
political, social, or other mutual purposes as authorized by law, established
not for pecuniary gain, have provided for their mutual convenience and for
the preparation and serving to themselves and their guests mixed drinks
prepared from alcoholic beverages owned by the members individually or in
common under a so-called “locker”, “pool”, or “revolving fund” system;
(2) Many individuals travel to this state to assemble at
regional meetings and conventions to associate with other individuals who are
members of professional and social organizations and that:
(A) Many of the restaurants and entertainment facilities
used for the meetings and conventions promote the hospitality of the host
communities where the restaurants, convention, and entertainment facilities
are located;
(B) Many of the host organizations plan to serve mixed
drinks containing alcoholic beverages to their friends and guests at these
meetings and while entertaining and dining during these conventions; and
(C) Many of the host communities have individuals who have
associated together in private nonprofit corporations established for
recreational, social, community hospitality, professional association,
04-07-2025 10:30:00 CRH277

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 SB523
entertainment, or other mutual purposes established, not for pecuniary gain,
but for their mutual convenience and to provide for the preparation and
serving to themselves and their guests mixed drinks prepared from alcoholic
beverages owned by the members individually or in common under a so-called
locker, pool, or revolving fund system; and
(3)(A)(i)(1)(A) That there There are a number of counties or
parts of counties where the public retail sale of intoxicating liquors has
not been approved by the voters.
(ii)(B) However, within those counties or parts of
counties there are significant developments of tourism facilities and large-
event facilities that promote the economic development of the state.;
(B)(2) To ensure that tourism and large-event facilities
as well as other associated activities are allowed to exist to promote the
economic development in the state, a new hotel, restaurant, or large-event
facility private club permit, for use in those places where the public retail
sale of intoxicating liquors is not authorized, should be created.;
(C)(3) These permits are necessary so that persons
visiting hotels, restaurants, or large-event facilities in these areas will
be able to enjoy the amenities that a person might find in other states.;
(D)(4) This additional permit will enhance the experience
of going to hotels, restaurants, or large-event facilities that may display
items of historic interest, contain extensive art collections, or host
musical or dramatic presentations.; and
(E)(5) Further, since the counties or parts of counties in
which these hotels, restaurants, or large-event facilities will be located do
not allow the open public retail sale of intoxicating liquors, the hotel
facilities, restaurants, or large-event facilities should be allowed to offer
alcoholic beverages to guests.
(b)(1) In order to clarify the alcoholic beverage control laws of this
state and to regulate and prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages in
violation of the provisions of this subchapter and other applicable alcoholic
beverage control laws of this state, the General Assembly determines that the
preparation, mixing, and serving of mixed drinks, beer, and wine for
consumption only on the premises of a private club as defined in § 3-9-
202(14) § 3-9-202 by the members thereof and their guests and the making of a
charge for such services shall not be deemed to be a sale or be in violation
04-07-2025 10:30:00 CRH277

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 SB523
of any law of this state prohibiting the manufacture, sale, barter, loan, or
giving away of intoxicating liquor whenever:
(A) The If the private club permittee is a nonprofit
organization, the alcoholic beverages, beer, and wine so consumed have been
may be furnished or drawn from private stocks thereof belonging to such the
members, individually or in common under a so-called locker, pool, or
revolving fund system and are that is replenished only at the expense of such
the members; and
(B) The private club has acquired a permit from the
Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, in such the form as the board may
appropriately determine.
(2)(A) A private club may serve any alcoholic beverage furnished
or drawn under the provisions of subdivision (b)(1) of this section on the
golf course on which the private club is located when the private club is
hosting a professional golf tournament or other charitable golf tournament
sponsored by a charitable organization described in 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) and
the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division has been notified by
the private club at least sixty (60) calendar days prior to the beginning of
the event.
(B) Persons attending the event may purchase alcoholic
beverages from the private club shall be deemed guests of the private club,
and the club may serve the alcoholic beverages to the guests for cash.
(C) The director may promulgate rules he or she deems
necessary to implement this subdivision (b)(2).
(c) In order to clarify the alcoholic beverage control laws of this
state and to regulate and prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages in
violation of the provisions of this subchapter and other applicable alcoholic
beverage control laws of this state, the General Assembly determines that the
preparation, mixing, and serving of wine and beer for consumption only by the
lodging guests on the premises of a bed and breakfast private club as defined
in § 3-9-202(2)§ 3-9-202 and the making of a charge for such the services
shall not be deemed to be a sale or to be in violation of any law of this
state prohibiting the manufacture, sale, barter, loan, or giving away of
intoxicating liquor whenever:
(1) The wine and beer so consumed have been furnished or drawn
from private stocks belonging to an owner of the bed and breakfast private
04-07-2025 10:30:00 CRH277

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 SB523
club and are replenished only at the expense of such owner;
(2) The wine and beer consumed must have been purchased in an
Arkansas licensed retail alcoholic beverage store, as authorized by the
director;
(3)(2) The average annual volume of wine and beer consumed shall
not exceed three gallons (3 gals.) per month per guest room; and
(4)(3) The bed and breakfast private club has acquired a permit
from the board in such form as the board may appropriately determine.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 3-9-222(c)(3), as amended by Acts 2025,
No. 421, § 4, concerning the contents of the notice required to be published
by an applicant for a private club permit, is amended to read as follows:
(3) The notice shall give the names of the managing agent and
the nonprofit corporation or, in the case of a bed and breakfast private
club, the name of the business owner, and shall state:
(A) That the manager, or in the case of a bed and
breakfast private club or a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility
private club, the owner, at least one (1) partner, or the majority
stockholder is a citizen of Arkansas;
(B) That he or she is of good moral character;
(C) That he or she has never been convicted of a felony or
had a license to sell or dispense alcoholic beverages revoked within the five
(5) years preceding the date of the notice; and
(D) That he or she has never been convicted of violating
the laws of this state or of any other state governing the sale or dispensing
of alcoholic beverages.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 3-9-223(b), concerning a supplemental tax
on gross receipts for private clubs, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) In addition, there is levied a supplemental tax of ten percent
(10%) upon the gross proceeds or gross receipts derived by the private club
from the charges to members or guests for the preparation and serving of
mixed drinks or for the cooling and serving of beer and wine, drawn from the
private stocks of the members as provided in § 3-9-221, for consumption only
on the premises where served.
(2) In addition to the tax levied under subdivision (b)(1) of
04-07-2025 10:30:00 CRH277

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 SB523
this section, a supplemental tax of four percent (4%) is levied on the gross
proceeds or gross receipts derived by the private club from the charges to
members or guests for the preparation and serving of mixed drinks drawn from
the private stocks of the members as provided in § 3-9-221 for consumption
only on the premises where served.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 3-9-223(e), concerning the passing on of
taxes prescribed on a private club, is amended to read as follows:
(e) The taxes herein prescribed may be passed on to the members or
guests.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 3-9-224 is repealed.
3-9-224. Private clubs — Sales prohibited.
(a) No private club permitted hereunder shall sell alcoholic beverages
either by the package or drink.
(b) Alcoholic beverages, beer, and wine owned by members may be stored
on the premises of the club.
(c) If any permittee shall sell, barter, loan, or give away any
intoxicating liquor in violation of this subchapter or other alcoholic
beverage control laws of this state, the permit of the club shall be revoked.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 3-9-226(b)(2), concerning the prohibition
on advertising or promoting the consumption of alcoholic beverages by private
clubs, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The prohibition on advertising or promoting the consumption
of alcoholic beverages under subdivision (b)(1) of this section does not
require a private club to block visibility through the private club's
windows, or doors, or barriers to prevent the general public from viewing
patrons consuming alcoholic beverages, including without limitation through
the use of window tinting.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 3-9-226(c)(3), concerning the requirement
that advertising by a private club for a social function contain a "notice to
members", is repealed.
(3) The advertising for the social function shall be preceded by
the words “Notice to Members” and the name of the club or organization
04-07-2025 10:30:00 CRH277

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 SB523
sponsoring such social activity.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 3-9-226, concerning advertising by a
private club, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(d) This section shall not apply to a private club permit holder
operating under substantially the same trade name in both wet and dry
territories provided that the advertising is:
(1) Not directed exclusively toward a dry territory; and
(2) Otherwise compliant with applicable law.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 3-9-240, as amended by Acts 2025, No. 421,
§ 5, is amended to read as follows:
3-9-240. Hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club
permit.
(a)(1) An application for a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility
private club permit shall be in writing and shall provide information
concerning the applicant for the hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility
private club permit and the premises to be used by the applicant as the
Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division requires.
(2) A hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club
permit may be issued only in a county or a territory of a county that does
not allow the public retail sale of intoxicating liquors as provided under §
3-8-201.
(3) A hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club
permit may be issued to a corporation, partnership, individual, or limited
liability company.
(b) The application for a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility
private club permit shall be accompanied by a check or money order for the
amount required by this section for the hotel, restaurant, or large-event
facility private club permit.
(c) A hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club permit
application shall contain a description of the premises permitted and provide
proof that the space has at least:
(1) Eighty (80) lodging rooms and five thousand square feet
(5,000 sq. ft.) of public meeting, banquet, or restaurant space from a hotel;
or
04-07-2025 10:30:00 CRH277

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 SB523
(2) Ten thousand square feet (10,000 sq. ft.) of interior or
exterior public meeting, banquet, exhibit hall, or restaurant space from a
large-event facility; or
(3) Seating capacity for not fewer than one hundred (100) people
in the restaurant that otherwise complies with the requirements of § 3-9-
202(16).
(d) If the director grants an application for a hotel, restaurant, or
large-event facility private club permit, he or she shall issue a hotel,
restaurant, or large-event facility private club permit in a form as
determined by the rules of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.
(e)(1) A hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club
permit authorizes the dispensing, service, and consumption of alcoholic
beverages by and to guests on the premises of a hotel, restaurant, or large-
event facility for on-premises consumption.
(2) The areas of a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility
that may be utilized by a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private
club permittee for purposes of a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility
private club permit include without limitation:
(A) Sleeping rooms;
(B) Pool-side bars;
(C) Banquet facilities;
(D) Restaurants;
(E) Lobbies;
(F) Exhibit halls;
(G) Patios; and
(H) Outdoor gardens.
(3) Guests of the hotel or large-event facility private club
permittee that holds a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private
club permit may move from one area to another area designated under
subdivision (e)(2) of this section while consuming alcoholic beverages.
(f)(1) A person must be a guest of the hotel, restaurant, or large-
event facility private club permittee to consume or possess alcoholic
beverages dispensed by the hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private
club permittee.
(2) Persons under twenty-one (21) years of age may be allowed on
the premises of the hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club
04-07-2025 10:30:00 CRH277

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 SB523
permittee.
(3)(A) A hotel holding a hotel, restaurant, or large-event
facility private club permit under this section may use room service to serve
the alcoholic beverage.
(B) The hotel holding a hotel, restaurant, or large-event
facility private club permit may stock a sleeping room with alcoholic
beverages, and the hotel or large-event facility private club permittee
through the hotel's employees shall inventory the alcoholic beverages in the
sleeping room.
(C) Sleeping rooms that are solely occupied by persons
twenty (20) years of age and under shall not receive alcoholic beverages
through room service or be stocked with alcoholic beverages.
(g)(1)(A) For a hotel and a restaurant, the application and renewal
fee for a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club permit is
one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per year payable on or before June
30 of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1.
(B) In an area in which the sale of intoxicating liquor
has not been authorized by local option as provided under § 3-8-201 et seq.,
the application for a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club
permit shall be accompanied by an additional application fee of one thousand
five hundred dollars ($1,500).
(2) The application and renewal fee for a large-event facility
for a hotel, restaurant, or large-event facility private club permit is two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per year payable on or before June 30
of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1.
(h) The director shall promulgate rules to enforce this section.

SECTION 21. DO NOT CODIFY. Transitional language.
(a) Upon the effective date of this act, a private club permit
currently held by a nonprofit corporation shall, upon written request by the
board of directors of the nonprofit corporation to the Alcoholic Beverage
Control Division and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division, be
transferred to a corporation, partnership, individual, or limited liability
company organized and existing under or authorized to do business under the
laws of this state operating at the same location.
(b) The successor entity and the entity's owners under a transfer
04-07-2025 10:30:00 CRH277

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 SB523
under subsection (a) of this section shall comply with all applicable private
club permit application procedures under existing law, except that a new
private club permit fee or application fee shall not be required.
(c) Upon approval of a transfer to the new entity, the board of
directors of a nonprofit corporation holding a private club permit may
transfer all assets of the nonprofit corporation, including without
limitation all alcoholic beverage inventories, equipment, and property, to
the successor business entity identified under subsection (a) of this
section.
(d) For a period of five (5) years from the effective date of this
act, the Secretary of State shall waive all fees associated with the
dissolution of nonprofit corporations currently holding private club permits
that become unnecessary due to the transfer authorized by this act.

/s/Irvin





















04-07-2025 10:30:00 CRH277